Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Services, Rates, Charges, etc.
§ 56-235.5.
Telephone regulatory alternatives.

As used in this section, “telephone company” means any public service corporation or public service company which holds a certificate of public convenience and necessity to furnish local exchange telephone service, except that companies which are regulated
pursuant to Chapter 16 (§ 56-485 et seq.) or 19 (§ 56-531 et seq.) of this title are not included within this definition.

In regulating telephone services of any telephone company, and notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Commission, after giving notice and an opportunity for hearing, may replace the ratemaking methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 with
any alternative form of regulation which: (i) protects the affordability of basic local exchange telephone service, as such service is defined by the Commission; (ii) reasonably ensures the continuation of quality local exchange
telephone service; (iii) will not unreasonably prejudice or disadvantage any class of telephone company customers or other providers of competitive services; and (iv) is in the public interest. Alternatives may differ among telephone
companies and may include, but are not limited to, the use of price regulation, ranges of authorized returns, categories of services, price indexing or other alternative forms of regulation. A hearing under this section shall include
the right to present evidence and be heard. Prior to any hearing under this section, the Commission shall provide parties an opportunity to conduct discovery.

Any telephone company or company regulated pursuant to Chapter 16 (§ 56-485 et seq.) or 19 (§ 56-531 et seq.) of this title may apply to the Commission at any time to obtain an alternative form of regulation. The Commission shall approve the application
if it finds, after notice to all affected parties and hearing, that the proposal meets the standards for an alternative form of regulation set forth in subsection B.

A Commission order, including appropriate findings of fact and conclusions of law, denying or approving, with or without modification, an application for an alternative form of regulation shall be entered no more than 90 days from the filing of the application,
except that the Commission, upon notice to all parties in interest, may extend that period in additional 30-day increments not to exceed an additional 90 days in all.

If the Commission approves the application with modifications, the telephone company, or company regulated pursuant to Chapter 16 (§ 56-485 et seq.) or 19 (§ 56-531 et seq.) of this title, may, at its option, withdraw its application and continue to be
regulated under the form of regulation that existed immediately prior to the filing of the application, unless it is modified for a telephone company by the Commission pursuant to subsection B.

The Commission may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, alter, amend or revoke any alternative form of regulation previously implemented if it finds that (i) the affordability of basic local exchange service, as such service is defined by the Commission,
is threatened by the alternative form of regulation; (ii) the quality of local exchange telephone service has deteriorated or will deteriorate to the point that the public interest will not be served by continuation of the alternative
form of regulation; (iii) the terms ordered by the Commission in connection with approval of a company’s application for alternative form of regulation have been violated; (iv) any class of telephone company customers or other
providers of competitive services are being unreasonably prejudiced or disadvantaged by the alternative form of regulation; or (v) the alternative form of regulation is no longer in the public interest.

The Commission shall have the authority, after notice to all affected parties and an opportunity for hearing, to determine whether any telephone service of a telephone company is subject to competition and to provide, either by rule or case-by-case determination,
for deregulation, detariffing, or modified regulation determined by the Commission to be in the public interest for such competitive services.

The Commission may determine telephone services of any telephone company to be competitive when it finds competition or the potential for competition in the market place is or can be an effective regulator of the price of those services. Such determination
may be made by the Commission on a statewide or a more limited geographic basis, such as one or more political subdivisions or one or more telephone exchange areas, or on the basis of a category of customers, such as business or
residential customers, or customers exceeding a revenue or service quantity threshold, or some combination thereof. The Commission may also determine bundles composed of a combination of competitive and noncompetitive services
to be competitive if the noncompetitive services are available separately pursuant to tariff or otherwise. In determining whether competition effectively regulates the prices of services, the Commission shall consider: (i) the
ease of market entry, (ii) the presence of other providers reasonably meeting the needs of consumers, and (iii) other factors the Commission considers relevant. For purposes of this section, the Commission shall consider all wireless
communications providers that offer voice communications services to be facilities-based competitors owning wireline network facilities and reasonably meeting the needs of consumers, regardless of whether such wireless providers
own wireline network facilities. In its determination, the Commission shall not exclude as a competitor any affiliate of the telephone company. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, any telephone services that
are the functional equivalent of the services offered individually or as part of a bundle of services by a county, city or town pursuant to § 56-265.4:4 or Article 5.1 (§ 56-484.7:1 et seq.) of Chapter 15 of this title, either
directly or pursuant to a public-private partnership, shall be deemed competitive services in the geographic area where the services of the county, city or town are offered for purposes of this article and any alternate regulatory
plans approved by the Commission.

The Commission shall monitor the competitiveness of any telephone service previously found by it to be competitive under any provision of subsection F above and may change that conclusion, if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, it finds that
competition no longer effectively regulates the price of that service.

Whenever the Commission adopts an alternative form of regulation pursuant to subsection B or C above, or determines that a service is competitive pursuant to subsections E and F above, the Commission shall adopt safeguards to protect consumers and competitive
markets. At a minimum these safeguards must ensure that there is no cross subsidization of competitive services by monopoly services.

If the Commission determines pursuant to subsections E and F that 75 percent or more of residential households or businesses in a telephone company’s incumbent territory are in areas that have been determined by the Commission to be competitive for a
telephone service, the Commission shall expand, for that telephone service throughout the company’s incumbent territory, its competitive determination and apply the same regulatory treatment already adopted by the Commission for
that telephone service in competitive areas, including any safeguards under subsection H.

If a telephone company provides 90 percent or more of its residential and business lines access to fiber optic or copper-based broadband service, as defined by the Federal Communications Commission, within an exchange area, the Commission shall expand,
for basic and associated telephone services in that exchange area, its competitive determination and apply the same regulatory treatment already adopted by the Commission for those services in competitive areas, including any safeguards
under subsection H.

History.
1993, c. 21; 1996, c. 18; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2003, c. 711; 2009, c. 788.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 340 and 376, cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, (i) the residential price cap approved by the State Corporation Commission in Case No. PUC-2012-00008 shall continue in effect until it expires as currently
scheduled on December 31, 2014, and (ii) any safeguards ordered by the Commission in response to competitive service applications filed pursuant to subsection F of § 56-235.5 of the Code of Virginia after January 1, 2014, shall continue
in effect as ordered by the Commission.”

The 1996 amendment
inserted “an opportunity for” preceding “hearing” in subsection E.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and in subsection F, inserted the second sentence, in the last sentence substituted “shall” for “may” following the first occurrence of “Commission,” and substituted the language beginning “any telephone
services that are the functional equivalent of the services provided” for “all services classified as actually competitive services under the provisions of the Experimental Plan adopted by the Commission in Case No PUC880035 in its
final order of December 15, 1988, and remaining so classified as of the effective date of this section, shall be considered to be competitive services” at the end of that sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 711 substituted “90 days” for “ninety days” twice, and substituted “30-day increments” for “thirty-day increments” once, in subdivision C 1; and in subsection F, inserted “or on the basis of a category of customers, such as business
or residential customers, or customers exceeding a revenue or service quantity threshold, or some combination thereof” at the end of the second sentence, added the present third sentence, and substituted “services offered individually
or as part of a bundle of services by a county” for “services provided by a county” in the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 788 inserted the fifth and sixth sentences in subsection F; and added subsections I and J.

Law Review.

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-235.5:1.
Local exchange telephone service competition policy.

The Commission, in resolving issues and cases concerning local exchange telephone service under the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104), this title, or both, shall, consistent with federal and state laws, consider it in the public interest
to, as appropriate, (i) treat all providers of local exchange telephone services in an equitable fashion and without undue discrimination and, to the greatest extent possible, apply the same rules to all providers of local exchange
telephone services; (ii) promote competitive product offerings, investments, and innovations from all providers of local exchange telephone services in all areas of the Commonwealth; and (iii) reduce or eliminate any requirement
to price retail and wholesale products and services at levels that do not permit providers of local exchange telephone services to recover their costs of those products and services.

In order to treat all providers of local exchange telephone service more equitably and without undue discrimination by ensuring that they are subject to the same rules:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commission shall (i) for incumbent local exchange carriers serving more than 15,000 access lines in its incumbent territory, establish a schedule that eliminates the carrier common line charge element of
intrastate carrier switched access charges no later than July 1, 2013, provided that (a) any such carrier that directly receives no later than April 1, 2010, a Broadband Initiatives Program grant and loan for use in the
Commonwealth from the Rural Utilities Service of the U.S. Department of Agriculture under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (P.L. 111-5) shall be considered under clause (ii), and (b) any such carrier that
has not been the subject of a Commission proceeding to investigate its carrier common line charge may apply to the Commission for an opportunity to be heard as to why it is in the public interest and why it will not unreasonably
prejudice or disadvantage telephone customers throughout the Commonwealth to extend the deadline for the elimination of its carrier common line charge to a date determined by the Commission, but in no case later than July
1, 2014; and (ii) for incumbent local exchange carriers with 15,000 or fewer access lines in its incumbent territory, determine, no later than July 1, 2011, and after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, a schedule
for the elimination of the carrier common line charge element of intrastate carrier switched access charges in a manner to be determined by the Commission.

The Commission shall permit any incumbent local exchange carrier to increase its retail rates to recover a reasonable amount of carrier common line charge revenue lost due to the reductions required in subdivision 1.

History.
2004, c. 151; 2010, c. 748; 2013, c. 26.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 748 inserted the subsection A designation; and inserted subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 26 deleted former subdivision B 3, which read: “The Commission shall (i) not permit any incumbent local exchange carrier to add additional elements of intrastate carrier switched access charges or to increase the charge for any
element of intrastate carrier switched access charges above that incumbent local exchange carrier’s charges on January 1, 2010; (ii) on July 1, 2010, take any action necessary to eliminate any element of intrastate carrier switched
access charges implemented by an incumbent local exchange carrier after January 1, 2010; and (iii) on July 1, 2010, take any action necessary to reduce to its January 1, 2010, level any element of intrastate carrier switched access
charges increased by an incumbent local exchange carrier after January 1, 2010.”

Law Review.

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-235.6.
Optional performance-based regulation of certain utilities.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Commission may approve a performance-based ratemaking methodology for any public utility engaged in the business of furnishing gas service (for the purposes of this section a “gas utility”) or
electricity service (for the purposes of this section an “electric utility”), upon application of the gas utility or electric utility, and after such notice and opportunity for hearing as the Commission may prescribe. For the purposes
of this section, “performance-based ratemaking methodology” shall mean a method of establishing rates and charges that are in the public interest, and that departs in whole or in part from the cost-of-service methodology set forth
in § 56-235.2.

The Commission shall approve such performance-based ratemaking methodology if it finds that it: (i) preserves adequate service to all classes of customers (including transportation-only customers if for a gas utility); (ii) does not unreasonably prejudice
or disadvantage any class of gas utility or electric utility customers; (iii) provides incentives for improved performance by the gas utility or electric utility in the conduct of its public duties; (iv) results in rates that are
not excessive; and (v) is in the public interest. Performance-based forms of regulation may include, but not be limited to, fixed or capped base rates, the use of revenue indexing, price indexing, ranges of authorized return, gas
cost indexing for gas utilities, and innovative utilization of utility-related assets and activities (such as a gas utility’s off-system sales of excess gas supplies and release of upstream pipeline capacity, performance of billing
services for other gas or electricity suppliers, and reduction or elimination of regulatory requirements) in ways that benefit both the utility and its customers and may include a mechanism for automatic annual adjustments to revenues
or prices to reflect changes in any index adopted for the implementation of such performance-based form of regulation. In making the findings required by this subsection, the Commission shall include, but not be limited to, in
its considerations: (i) any proposed measures, including investments in infrastructure, that are reasonably estimated to preserve or improve system reliability, safety, supply diversity, and gas utility transportation options;
and (ii) other customer benefits that are reasonably estimated to accrue from the gas or electric utility’s proposal.

Each gas utility or electric utility shall have the option to apply for implementation of a performance-based form of regulation. If the Commission approves the application with modifications, the gas utility or electric utility may, at its option, withdraw
its application and continue to be regulated under the form of regulation that existed immediately prior to the filing of the application. The Commission may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, alter, amend or revoke, or
authorize a gas utility or electric utility to discontinue, a performance-based form of regulation previously implemented under this section if it finds that (i) service to one or more classes of customers has deteriorated, or
will deteriorate, to the point that the public interest will not be served by continuation of the performance-based form of regulation; (ii) any class of gas utility customer or electric utility customer is being unreasonably prejudiced
or disadvantaged by the performance-based form of regulation; (iii) the performance-based form of regulation does not, or will not, provide reasonable incentives for improved performance by a gas utility or electric utility in
the conduct of its public duties (which determination may include, but not be limited to, consideration of whether rates are inadequate to recover a gas utility’s or electric utility’s cost of service); (iv) the performance-based
form of regulation is resulting in rates that are excessive compared to a gas utility’s or electric utility’s cost of service and any benefits that accrue from the performance-based plan; (v) the terms ordered by the Commission
in connection with approval of a gas utility’s or electric utility’s implementation of a performance-based form of regulation have been violated; or (vi) the performance-based form of regulation is no longer in the public interest.
Any request by a gas utility or electric utility to discontinue its implementation of a performance-based form of regulation may include application pursuant to this chapter for approval of new rates under the standards of § 56-235.2
for a gas utility or pursuant to § 56-585.1 for an investor-owned incumbent electric utility.

The Commission shall use the annual review process established in § 56-234.2 to monitor each performance-based form of regulation approved under this section and to make any annual prospective adjustments to revenues or prices necessary to reflect increases
or decreases in any index adopted for the implementation of such performance-based form of regulation.

History.
1996, c. 350; 2006, c. 574; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

Cross references.

As to the Natural Gas Conservation and Ratemaking Efficiency Act, see § 56-600 et seq.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by c. 574 rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “fixed or capped base rates,” deleted “and” following “upstream pipeline capacity,” inserted “and reduction or eliminaton of regulatory requirements,” added the last sentence
of the subsection; inserted “and any benefits that accrue from the performance-based plan” at the end of clause (iv) in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “or electricity service (for the purposes of this section an ‘electric utility’)” for “either” and “electric utility” for “upon its own motion”; inserted “or electric
utility” and “a gas utility” and made similar and related changes throughout subsections B and C; added “for a gas utility or pursuant to § 56-585.1 for an investor-owned incumbent electric utility” to the end of subsection C; and
made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).

§ 56-235.7.
Jurisdiction of Commission when federal governmental facility ceases to be retail customer of electric utility.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in § 56-234, the rates and charges for service to any federal governmental facility that is a retail customer of any electric utility prior to January 1, 1996, and which ceases, in whole or in part, to be a retail
customer of that electric utility after January 1, 1996, because of its purchase of electricity from another supplier shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission for the limited purpose of determining the proper rate, if
any, to be paid by the federal government to the electric utility for any and all costs stranded due to the cessation of such retail service, and payments of such costs shall be made pursuant to a tariff filed and approved by the Commission;
provided, however, the Commission’s jurisdiction shall not arise unless and until the effective date of any federal action that allows any federal governmental facility to purchase electricity from a supplier other than the electric
public service company now providing electric service to such federal facility.

History.
1996, c. 466.

Editor’s note.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1996 act having been 56-235.6.

Law Review.

For an article, “Public Utility Law,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1173 (1997).